Utah statutes.
58-5a-304.   Continuing education.

(1)  The division may require each person holding a license under this chapter to complete in each two-year period not more than 40 hours of qualified continuing professional education in accordance with standards defined by rule as a requirement prior to license renewal under this chapter.

(2)  In establishing continuing education requirements under this section the division shall in collaboration with the board recognize the existing educational methods, procedures, devices, and programs in use among the various podiatry specialty organizations.

(3)  The division shall give licensees credit toward continuing education requirements for participation in and completion of continuing education programs of:

(a)  the American Podiatric Medical Association;

(b)  the Utah Podiatric Medical Association;

(c)  all colleges of podiatric medicine accredited by the Council on Education of the American Podiatric Medical Association; and

(d)  similar programs of other organizations that are approved by the division in collaboration with the board.

(4)  If a renewal period is shortened or extended to effect a change of the renewal cycle, the continuing education hours required for that renewal period shall be increased or decreased accordingly, as a pro rata amount of the requirements of a two-year period.



Amended by Chapter 232, 1996 General Session

